Tennessee, session 114, SB0145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103(h)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "until June 30, 2028".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103(h)(2), is amended by
deleting the last sentence of the subdivision and substituting instead:
For purposes of this subdivision (h)(2), "courthouse square revitalization zone"
consists of the area that is included within the courthouse square revitalization
zone on June 1, 2015.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0145
000262
- 1 -